District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-906

Reports.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-107, § 7, 25 DCR 1391
July 23, 1992, D.C. Law 9-134, § 301(b)(4), 39 DCR 4066
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-145, § 301(b)(4), 39 DCR 4895
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 514, 60 DCR 3390

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1106.
1973 Ed., § 2-2506.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 301(b)(4) of Omnibus Budget Support Temporary Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-134, July 23, 1992, law notification 39 DCR 5815).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 301(b)(4) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-203, April 29, 1992, 39 DCR 3219).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).

Editor's Notes

Application of § 301 of Law 9-145: Section 501(c)(3) of D.C. Law 9-145 provided that § 301 shall apply as of October 1, 1992.